New York, session 2025-2026, S2580.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1885 to read as follows: 3 § 1885. Biodiesel grant program. 1. The authority shall provide grants 4 of matching funds for costs associated with the agricultural production 5 of biodiesel fuel. 6 2. All moneys received or accepted pursuant to this section shall be 7 deposited into the biodiesel grant program fund established pursuant to 8 section ninety-nine-ss of the state finance law. 9 3. For purposes of this section, "biodiesel fuel" shall mean a fuel 10 comprised of mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from 11 vegetable oils or animal fats, designated B100, and meeting the require- 12 ments of the ASTM of D 6751. 13 4. The authority shall establish guidelines for the application and 14 administration of the biodiesel grant program. 15 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 99-ss to 16 read as follows: 17 § 99-ss. Biodiesel grant program fund. 1. There is hereby established 18 in the joint custody of the comptroller and the chairman of the New York 19 state energy research and development authority, a fund to be known as 20 the biodiesel grant program fund. 21 2. Moneys of the biodiesel grant program fund, following appropriation 22 by the legislature and allocation by the director of the budget, shall 23 be available to such chair for the administration of the biodiesel grant EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06863-01-5 S. 2580 2 1 program established by section eighteen hundred eighty-five of the 2 public authorities law. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 4 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 5 the New York state energy research and development authority shall 6 establish any rules or regulations necessary for the implementation of 7 this act on its effective date.